Utah statutes.
31A-22-1707.   Enforcement -- Rulemaking.

(1)  A certificate of insurance or other document that is prepared, issued, or requested in violation of this part is void.

(2)  The commissioner may bring action in accordance with Section 31A-2-308 and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, for a violation of this part.

(3)  The commissioner may:

(a)  examine and investigate the activities of any person who the commissioner believes has been or is engaged in an act prohibited by this part;

(b)  enforce this part; and

(c)  impose a penalty or enforce a remedy authorized by this title for a violation of this part.

(4)  The commissioner may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that are necessary and proper to carry out this part.

